Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-6510
Violation; unfair trade practice.

Any violation of the Pet Insurance Act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act shall be considered an unfair trade practice under the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act in addition to any other remedies and penalties available under the laws of this state.

Laws 2023, LB296, § 10.

Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act, see section 44-1521.